Vermont, session 2025-2026, H616.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 16 V.S.A. § 821 is amended to read:
§ 821. SCHOOL DISTRICT TO MAINTAIN PUBLIC ELEMENTARY
SCHOOLS OR PAY TUITION
(a) Each school district shall maintain one or more approved schools within
the district in which elementary education for its resident students in
kindergarten through grade six is provided unless:
VT LEG #386203 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.616
2026 Page 2 of 5
(1) the electorate authorizes the school board to provide for the
elementary education of the students by paying tuition in accordance with law
to one or more public elementary schools in one or more school districts;
(2) the school district is organized to provide only high school education
for its students; or
(3) the General Assembly provides otherwise.
(b) [Repealed.]
(c) Notwithstanding subsection (a) of this section, without previous
authorization by the electorate, a school board in a district that operates an
elementary school may pay tuition for elementary students who reside near a
public elementary school in an adjacent district upon request of the student’s
parent or guardian, if in the board’s judgment the student’s education can be
more conveniently furnished there due to geographic considerations. Within
30 days of following the board’s decision, a parent or guardian who is
dissatisfied with the decision of the board under this subsection may request a
determination by the Secretary, who shall have authority to direct the school
board to pay all, some, or none of the student’s tuition and whose decision
shall be final.
(d) Notwithstanding subdivision (a)(1) of this section, the electorate of a
school district that does not maintain an elementary school may grant general
authority to the school board to pay tuition for an elementary student at an
VT LEG #386203 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.616
2026 Page 3 of 5
approved independent elementary school or an independent school meeting
education quality standards pursuant to sections 823 and 828 of this chapter
upon notice given by the student’s parent or legal guardian before April 15 for
the next academic year.
(e) Notwithstanding subsection (a) of this section or any other provision of
law to the contrary, at the request of a parent or legal guardian of a resident
student, a school board in a district that operates an elementary school shall
pay tuition for the elementary student to enroll full time with the virtual
learning provider that the Agency of Education maintains access to and
oversight of pursuant to section 948 of this title. The district shall pay the full
tuition charged by the virtual learning provider.
Sec. 2. 16 V.S.A. § 822 is amended to read:
§ 822. SCHOOL DISTRICT TO MAINTAIN PUBLIC HIGH SCHOOLS OR
PAY TUITION
(a) Each school district shall maintain one or more approved high schools
in which high school education is provided for its resident students unless:
(1) the electorate authorizes the school board to close an existing high
school and to provide for the high school education of its students by paying
tuition to a public high school, an approved independent high school, or an
independent school meeting education quality standards, to be selected by the
parents or guardians of the student, within or outside the State; or
VT LEG #386203 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.616
2026 Page 4 of 5
(2) the school district is organized to provide only elementary education
for its students.
(b) For purposes of this section, a school district that is organized to
provide kindergarten through grade 12 and maintains a program of education
for only the first eight years of compulsory school attendance shall be
obligated to pay tuition for its resident students for at least four additional
years.
(c)(1) A school district may both maintain a high school and furnish high
school education by paying tuition:
(A) to To a public school as in the judgment of the school board may
best serve the interests of the students; or.
(B) to To an approved independent school or an independent school
meeting education quality standards if the school board judges that a student
has unique educational needs that cannot be served within the district or at a
nearby public school.
(C) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, at the
request of a student’s parent or legal guardian, a school district shall pay
tuition to the virtual learning provider that the Agency of Education maintains
access to and oversight of pursuant to section 948 of this title for the student’s
full-time enrollment. The district shall pay the full tuition charged by the
virtual learning provider.
VT LEG #386203 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.616
2026 Page 5 of 5
(2) The judgment of the board shall be final in regard to the institution
the students may attend at public cost.
Sec. 3. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2026.
VT LEG #386203 v.3